Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 2
INTERGOVERNMENTAL RELATIONSHIPS

Editor's note:

This part 2 was numbered as article 2 of chapter 88, C.R.S. 1963. The provisions of this part 2 were repealed and reenacted in 1971, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this part 2 prior to 1971, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Law reviews:

For article, "The IGA: A Smart Approach For Local Governments", see 29

C

olo. Law. 73 (June 2000).

29-1-201. Legislative declaration.

The purpose of this part 2 is to implement the provisions of section 18 (2)(a) and (2)(b) of article XIV of the state constitution, adopted at the 1970 general election, and the amendment to section 2 of article XI of the state constitution, adopted at the 1974 general election, by permitting and encouraging governments to make the most efficient and effective use of their powers and responsibilities by cooperating and contracting with other governments, and to this end this part 2 shall be liberally construed.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 955, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 88-2-1.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 955, § 1, effective May 20.

29-1-202. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Government" means any political subdivision of the state, any agency or department of the state government or of the United States, a federally recognized tribal entity, and any political subdivision of an adjoining state.

"Political subdivision" means a county, city and county, city, town, service authority, school district, local improvement district, law enforcement authority, city or county housing authority, or water, sanitation, fire protection, metropolitan, irrigation, drainage, or other special district, or any other kind of municipal, quasi-municipal, or public corporation organized pursuant to law.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 955, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 88-2-2.

L. 99:

(2) amended, p. 128, § 1, effective March 24.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 4, § 1, effective March 2.

29-1-203. Government may cooperate or contract - contents.

Governments may cooperate or contract with one another to provide any function, service, or facility lawfully authorized to each of the cooperating or contracting units, including the sharing of costs, the imposition of taxes, or the incurring of debt, only if such cooperation or contracts are authorized by each party thereto with the approval of its legislative body or other authority having the power to so approve. Any such contract providing for the sharing of costs or the imposition of taxes may be entered into for any period, notwithstanding any provision of law limiting the length of any financial contracts or obligations of governments.

Any such contract shall set forth fully the purposes, powers, rights, obligations, and the responsibilities, financial and otherwise, of the contracting parties.

Where other provisions of law provide requirements for special types of intergovernmental contracting or cooperation, those special provisions shall control.

Any such contract may provide for the joint exercise of the function, service, or facility, including the establishment of a separate legal entity to do so.

Any separate legal entity formed pursuant to the provisions of this part 2 may make loans to any government which enters into any contract pursuant to the provisions of this section, which loans may be secured by loan and security agreements, leases, or any other instruments upon such terms and conditions, including, without limitation, the terms and conditions authorized by section 31-35-402 (1)(h), C.R.S., as the board of directors of such intergovernmental entity shall determine.

The provisions of articles 10.5 and 47 of title 11, C.R.S., shall apply to moneys of such separate legal entities.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 956, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 88-2-3.

L. 88:

(5) added, p. 1098, § 1, effective April 13; (6) added, p. 429, § 8, effective April 20.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 1352, § 1, effective June 3.

29-1-203.5. Separate legal entity established under section 29-1-203 - legal status - authority to exercise special district powers - additional financing powers.

Any combination of counties, municipalities, special districts, or other political subdivisions of this state that are each authorized to own, operate, finance, or otherwise provide public improvements, functions, services, or facilities may enter into a contract under section 29-1-203 to establish a separate legal entity to provide any such public improvements, functions, services, or facilities. Any separate legal entity established is a political subdivision and public corporation of the state and is separate from the parties to the contract if the contract or an amendment to the contract states that the entity is formed in conformity with the provisions of this section and that the provisions of this section apply to the entity.

A contract establishing a separate legal entity described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) must specify:

The name and purpose of the entity and the functions or services to be provided by the entity;

The establishment and organization of a governing body of the entity, which must be a board of directors in which all legislative power of the entity is vested, including:

The number of directors, their manner of appointment, their terms of office, their compensation, if any, and the procedure for filling vacancies on the board;

The officers of the entity, the manner of their selection, and their duties;

The voting requirements for action by the board; except that, unless specifically provided otherwise, a majority of directors constitutes a quorum, and a majority of the quorum is necessary for any action taken by the board.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), a separate legal entity established by contract pursuant to section 29-1-203 may, to the extent provided by the contract or an amendment to the contract and deemed by the contracting parties to be necessary or convenient to allow the entity to achieve its purposes, exercise any general power of a special district specified in part 10 of article 1 of title 32, C.R.S., so long as each of the parties to the contract may lawfully exercise the power.

A separate legal entity established by a contract pursuant to section 29-1-203 that specifies that the provisions of this section apply to the entity may not levy a tax or exercise the power of eminent domain.

A separate legal entity established by contract pursuant to section 29-1-203 shall file a copy of the contract and any amendments to the contract with the division of local government in the department of local affairs and the division shall retain the contract and amendments as a public record.

In addition to any other powers set forth in a contract entered into pursuant to section 29-1-203 that establishes a separate legal entity and specifies that the provisions of this section apply to the entity, such an entity has the following powers:

To issue bonds, notes, or other financial obligations payable solely from revenue derived from one or more of the functions, services, systems, or facilities of the separate legal entity, from money received under contracts entered into by the separate legal entity, or from other available money of the separate legal entity. The terms, conditions, and details of bonds, notes, or other financial obligations, including related procedures and refunding conditions, must be set forth in the resolution of the separate legal entity authorizing the bonds, notes, or other financial obligations and must, to the extent practical, be substantially the same as those provided in part 4 of article 35 of title 31, C.R.S., relating to water and sewer revenue bonds; except that the purposes for which the same may be issued are not limited to the financing of water or sewerage facilities. Bonds, notes, or other financial obligations issued under this paragraph (a) are not an indebtedness of the separate legal entity or the cooperating or contracting parties within the meaning of any provision or limitation specified in the state constitution or law. Each bond, note, or other financial obligation issued under this paragraph (a) must recite in substance that it is payable solely from the revenues and other available funds of the separate legal entity pledged for the payment thereof and that it is not a debt of the separate legal entity or the cooperating or contracting parties within the meaning of any provision or limitation specified in the state constitution or law. Notwithstanding anything in this paragraph (a) to the contrary, bonds, notes, and other obligations may be issued to mature at such times not beyond forty years from their respective issue dates, shall bear interest at such rates, and shall be sold at, above, or below the principal amount thereof, at a public or private sale, all as determined by the board of directors of the separate legal entity. Interest on any bond, note, or other financial obligation issued under this paragraph (a) hereof is exempt from taxation except as otherwise may be provided by law. The resolution, trust indenture, or other security agreement under which bonds, notes, or other financial obligations are issued is a contract with the holders thereof and may contain such provisions as the board of directors of the separate legal entity determine to be appropriate and necessary in connection with the issuance thereof and to provide security for the payment thereof, including, without limitation, any mortgage or other security interest in revenue, money, rights, or property of the separate legal entity.

To acquire, lease, and sell property.

To establish special or local improvement districts within the boundaries of and with the consent of any of the counties, municipalities, special districts, or other political subdivisions that contract to establish the separate legal entity and levy special assessments on property specially benefited by improvements, functions, services or facilities, including forest health projects, as defined in section 37-95-103 (4.9), that the separate legal entity is authorized to provide.

The name of a special or local improvement district must include the name of the separate legal entity that established it.

Assessments must be levied on a frontage, area, zone, or other equitable basis and only:

With the written consent of all of the owners of the property to be assessed; or

Upon approval of a majority of the eligible electors of the district within the special or local improvement district voting thereon.

The method of creating a special or local improvement district, undertaking the improvements, functions, services, or facilities specified for the improvement district, and levying and collecting assessments for the costs of such undertaking specified for the improvement district shall be, as provided in part 5 of article 25 of title 31 for a special improvement district and as provided in part 6 of article 20 of title 30 for a local improvement district, subject to the following:

The separate legal entity shall have all the rights, powers, and duties of a municipality and its governing body as set forth in parts 5 and 11 of article 25 of title 31 or of a county and its board of county commissioners as set forth in part 6 of article 20 of title 30;

The board of directors of the separate legal entity constitutes the governing body and board of the improvement district;

The board of directors shall appoint officers who shall perform the duties of the officers as set forth in part 5 of article 25 of title 31 or part 6 of article 20 of title 30, as applicable; and

All actions taken by the board of directors pursuant to the provisions of part 5 of article 25 of title 31 shall be by resolution, notwithstanding any reference in said part 5 to action by ordinance.

(3.5) A separate legal entity established by contract pursuant to section 29-1-203 that has issued bonds, notes, or other financial obligations as authorized by paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of this section is subject to the "Public Securities Information Reporting Act", article 58 of title 11, C.R.S., and shall file an annual information report, to the extent practical, in the manner specified in section 11-58-105, C.R.S.

A contract entered into pursuant to section 29-1-203 that establishes a separate legal entity and specifies that the provisions of this section apply to the entity shall provide that, upon dissolution of the separate legal entity, all of its property is transferred to, or at the direction of, one or more of the contracting political subdivisions.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (HB 15-1262), ch. 215, p. 785, § 1, effective May 20.

L. 2016:

(2)(c) and (3.5) added, (HB 16-1188), ch. 86, p. 243, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2021:

(1)(a) amended and (3)(c) added, (HB 21-1008), ch. 159, p. 904, § 1, effective May 20.

29-1-204. Establishment of separate governmental entity.

Any combination of cities and towns of this state which are authorized to own and operate electric systems may, by contract with each other or with cities and towns of any adjoining state, establish a separate governmental entity, to be known as a power authority, to be used by such contracting municipalities to effect the development of electric energy resources or production and transmission of electric energy in whole or in part for the benefit of the inhabitants of such contracting municipalities.

Any contract establishing such separate governmental entity shall specify:

The name and purpose of such entity and the functions or services to be provided by such entity;

The establishment and organization of a governing body of the entity, which shall be a board of directors in which all legislative power of the entity is vested, including:

The number of directors, their manner of appointment, their terms of office, their compensation if any, and the procedure for filling vacancies on the board;

The officers of the entity, the manner of their selection, and their duties;

The voting requirements for action by the board; except that, unless specifically provided otherwise, a majority of directors shall constitute a quorum, and a majority of the quorum shall be necessary for any action taken by the board;

The duties of the board which shall include the obligation to comply with the provisions of parts 1, 5, and 6 of this article;

Provisions for the disposition, division, or distribution of any property or assets of the entity;

The term of the contract, which may be continued for a definite term or until rescinded or terminated, and the method, if any, by which it may be rescinded or terminated; except that such contract may not be rescinded or terminated so long as the entity has bonds, notes, or other obligations outstanding, unless provision for full payment of such obligations, by escrow or otherwise, has been made pursuant to the terms of such obligations.

The general powers of such entity shall include the following powers:

To develop electric energy resources and produce or transmit electric energy in whole or in part for the benefit of the inhabitants of the contracting municipalities;

To make and enter into contracts, including, without limitation, contracts with cities and towns in any adjoining state, irrespective of whether such cities and towns are parties to the contract establishing the separate governmental entity;

To employ agents and employees;

To acquire, construct, manage, maintain, or operate electric energy facilities, works, or improvements or any interest therein;

To acquire, hold, lease (as lessor or lessee), sell, or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property, commodity, or service;

To condemn property for public use, if such property is not owned by any public utility and devoted to such public use pursuant to state authority;

To incur debts, liabilities, or obligations;

To sue and be sued in its own name;

To have and use a corporate seal;

To fix, maintain, and revise fees, rates, and charges for functions, services, or facilities provided by the entity;

To adopt, by resolution, regulations respecting the exercise of its powers and the carrying out of its purposes;

To exercise any other powers which are essential to the provision of functions, services, or facilities by the entity and which are specified in the contract;

To do and perform any acts and things authorized by this section under, through, or by means of an agent or by contracts with any person, firm, or corporation;

To deposit moneys of the power authority not then needed in the conduct of the power authority affairs in any depository authorized in section 24-75-603, C.R.S. For the purpose of making such deposits, the board of directors may appoint, by written resolution, one or more persons to act as custodians of the moneys of the power authority. Such persons shall give surety bonds in such amounts and form and for such purposes as the board requires.

To acquire or cross railroad rights-of-way in the manner set forth in section 40-5-105, C.R.S.

The separate governmental entity established by such contracting municipalities shall be a political subdivision and a public corporation of the state, separate from the parties to the contract, and shall be a validly created and existing political subdivision and public corporation of the state, irrespective of whether a contracting municipality, including a city or town of an adjoining state, withdraws (whether voluntarily, by operation of law, or otherwise) from such entity subsequent to its creation under circumstances not resulting in the rescission or termination of the contract establishing such entity pursuant to its terms. It shall have the duties, privileges, immunities, rights, liabilities, and disabilities of a public body politic and corporate. The provisions of articles 10.5 and 47 of title 11, C.R.S., shall apply to moneys of the entity.

The bonds, notes, and other obligations of such separate governmental entity shall not be the debts, liabilities, or obligations of the contracting municipalities.

The contracting municipalities may provide in the contract for payment to the separate governmental entity of funds from proprietary revenues for services rendered by the entity, from proprietary revenues or other public funds as contributions to defray the cost of any purpose set forth in the contract, and from proprietary revenues or other public funds as advances for any purpose subject to repayment by the entity.

To carry out the purposes for which the separate governmental entity was established, the entity is authorized to issue bonds, notes, or other obligations payable solely from the revenues derived or to be derived from the function, service, or facility or the combined functions, services, or facilities of the entity or from any other available funds of the entity. The terms, conditions, and details of said bonds, notes, and other obligations, the procedures related thereto, and the refunding thereof shall be set forth in the resolution authorizing said bonds, notes, or other obligations and shall, as nearly as may be practicable, be substantially the same as those provided in part 4 of article 35 of title 31, C.R.S., relating to water and sewer revenue bonds; except that the purposes for which the same may be issued shall not be so limited and except that said bonds, notes, and other obligations may be sold at public or private sale. Bonds, notes, or other obligations issued under this subsection (7) shall not constitute an indebtedness of the entity or the cooperating or contracting municipalities within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitation or other provision. Each bond, note, or other obligation issued under this subsection (7) shall recite in substance that said bond, note, or other obligation, including the interest thereon, is payable solely from the revenues and other available funds of the entity pledged for the payment thereof and that said bond, note, or other obligation does not constitute a debt of the entity or the cooperating or contracting municipalities within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitations or provisions. Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, such bonds, notes, and other obligations may be issued to mature at such times not beyond forty years from their respective issue dates, shall bear interest at such rates, and shall be sold at, above, or below the principal amount thereof, all as shall be determined by the board of the entity. Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, in the case of short-term notes or other obligations maturing not later than one year from the date of issuance thereof, the board of the entity may authorize officials of the entity to fix principal amounts, maturity dates, interest rates, and purchase prices of any particular issue of such short-term notes or obligations, subject to such limitations as to maximum term, maximum principal amount outstanding, and maximum net effective interest rates as the board shall prescribe by resolution. Such action may be taken by the board of the entity only at a public meeting preceded by adequate notice, and the action of the board shall be properly recorded on the permanent records of the board.

The resolution, trust indenture, or other security agreement under which any bonds, notes, or other obligations are issued shall constitute a contract with the holders thereof, and it may contain such provisions as shall be determined by the board of the entity to be appropriate and necessary in connection with the issuance thereof and to provide security for the payment thereof, including, without limitation, any mortgage or other security interest in any revenues, funds, rights, or properties of the entity. The bonds, notes, and other obligations of the entity and the income therefrom shall be exempt from taxation, except inheritance, estate, and transfer taxes.

A separate governmental entity established by contracting municipalities shall, if the contract so provides, be the successor to any nonprofit corporation, agency, or other entity theretofore organized by the contracting municipalities to provide the same function, service, or facility, and such separate governmental entity shall be entitled to all rights and privileges and shall assume all obligations and liabilities of such other entity under existing contracts to which such other entity is a party.

The authority granted pursuant to this section shall in no manner limit the powers of governments to enter into intergovernmental cooperation or contracts or to establish separate legal entities pursuant to the provisions of section 29-1-203 or any other applicable law or otherwise to carry out their powers under applicable statutory or charter provisions, nor shall such authority limit the powers reserved to cities and towns by section 2 of article XI of the state constitution. Nothing in this part 2 constitutes a legislative declaration of preference for electric systems owned by separate governmental entities over electric systems owned by other or different entities.

For the purposes of subsection (1), paragraph (b) of subsection (3), and subsection (4) of this section, "cities and towns of any adjoining state" means any city or town located in any state sharing a common border with the state of Colorado which owns an electric system and which is located not more than fifteen miles from the common border of the state of Colorado and such adjoining state.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 955, § 2, effective May 20.

L. 76:

(1), (3)(b), and (4) amended and (10) added, pp. 683, 684, §§ 1, 2, effective May 7.

L. 77:

(4) and (10) amended, p. 286, §§ 54, 55, effective June 29.

L. 79:

(3)(n) added, p. 1616, § 11, effective June 8.

L. 82:

(1) amended, p. 453, § 1, effective March 17; (7)(a) amended, p. 455, § 1, effective April 16.

L. 2002:

(3)(o) added, p. 1948, § 5, effective June 8.

Editor's note:

This section was enacted as § 29-1-203.1 in House Bill 75-1666 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act enacting subsection (3)(o), see section 1 of chapter 350, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

29-1-204.2. Establishment of separate governmental entity to develop water resources, systems, facilities, and drainage facilities.

Any combination of municipalities, special districts, or other political subdivisions of this state that are authorized to own and operate water systems or facilities or drainage facilities may establish, by contract with each other, a separate governmental entity, to be known as a water or drainage authority, to be used by such contracting parties to effect the development of water resources, systems, or facilities or of drainage facilities in whole or in part for the benefit of the inhabitants of such contracting parties or others at the discretion of the board of directors of the water or drainage authority.

Any contract establishing such separate governmental entity shall specify:

The name and purpose of such entity and the functions or services to be provided by such entity;

The establishment and organization of a governing body of the entity, which shall be a board of directors in which all legislative power of the entity is vested, including:

The number of directors, their manner of appointment, their terms of office, their compensation, if any, and the procedure for filling vacancies on the board;

The officers of the entity, the manner of their selection, and their duties;

The voting requirements for action by the board; except that, unless specifically provided otherwise, a majority of directors shall constitute a quorum, and a majority of the quorum shall be necessary for any action taken by the board;

The duties of the board, which shall include the obligation to comply with the provisions of parts 1, 5, and 6 of this article;

Provisions for the disposition, division, or distribution of any property or assets of the entity;

The term of the contract, which may be continued for a definite term or until rescinded or terminated, and the method, if any, by which it may be rescinded or terminated; except that such contract may not be rescinded or terminated so long as the entity has bonds, notes, or other obligations outstanding, unless provision for full payment of such obligations, by escrow or otherwise, has been made pursuant to the terms of such obligations;

The conditions or requirements to be fulfilled for adding or deleting parties to the contract in the future or for providing water services and drainage facilities to others outside the boundaries of the contracting parties.

The general powers of such entity shall include the following powers:

To develop water resources, systems, or facilities or drainage facilities in whole or in part for the benefit of the inhabitants of the contracting parties or others, at the discretion of the board of directors, subject to fulfilling any conditions or requirements set forth in the contract establishing the entity;

To make and enter into contracts;

To employ agents and employees;

To acquire, construct, manage, maintain, or operate water systems, facilities, works, or improvements, or drainage facilities, or any interest therein;

To acquire, hold, lease (as lessor or lessee), sell, or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property utilized only for the purposes of water treatment, distribution, and wastewater disposal, or of drainage;

To condemn property for use as rights-of-way only if such property is not owned by any public utility and devoted to such public use pursuant to state authority;

To incur debts, liabilities, or obligations;

To sue and be sued in its own name;

To have and use a corporate seal;

To fix, maintain, and revise fees, rates, and charges for functions, services, or facilities provided by the entity;

To adopt, by resolution, regulations respecting the exercise of its powers and the carrying out of its purpose;

To exercise any other powers which are essential to the provision of functions, services, or facilities by the entity and which are specified in the contract;

To do and perform any acts and things authorized by this section under, through, or by means of an agent or by contracts with any person, firm, or corporation;

To permit other municipalities, special districts, or political subdivisions of this state that are authorized to supply water or to provide drainage facilities to enter the contract at the discretion of the board of directors, subject to fulfilling any and all conditions or requirements of the contract establishing the entity; except that rates need not be uniform between the authority and the contracting parties;

To provide for the rehabilitation of any surfaces adversely affected by the construction of water pipelines, facilities, or systems or of drainage facilities through the rehabilitation of plant cover, soil stability, and other measures appropriate to the subsequent beneficial use of such lands;

To justly indemnify property owners or others affected for any losses or damages incurred, including reasonable attorney fees, or that may subsequently be caused by or which result from actions of such corporations.

The separate governmental entity established by such contracting parties shall be a political subdivision and a public corporation of the state, separate from the parties to the contract. It shall have the duties, privileges, immunities, rights, liabilities, and disabilities of a public body politic and corporate. The provisions of articles 10.5 and 47 of title 11, C.R.S., shall apply to moneys of the entity.

The bonds, notes, and other obligations of a water or drainage authority formed under the provisions of this section shall not be the debts, liabilities, or obligations of the original contracting parties or parties that may enter the establishing contract in the future.

The contracting parties may provide in the contract for payment to the separate governmental entity of funds from proprietary revenues for services rendered by the entity, from proprietary revenues or other public funds as contributions to defray the cost of any purpose set forth in the contract, and from proprietary revenues or other public funds as advances for any purpose subject to repayment by the entity.

To carry out the purposes for which the separate governmental entity was established, the entity is authorized to issue bonds, notes, or other obligations payable solely from the revenues derived from the function, service, system, or facility or the combined functions, services, systems, or facilities of the entity or from any other available funds of the entity. The terms, conditions, and details of said bonds, notes, and other obligations, the procedures related thereto, and the refunding thereof shall be set forth in the resolution authorizing said bonds, notes, or other obligations and, as nearly as may be practicable, shall be substantially the same as those provided in part 4 of article 35 of title 31, C.R.S., relating to water and sewer revenue bonds; except that the purposes for which the same may be issued shall not be so limited and except that said bonds, notes, and other obligations may be sold at public or private sale. Bonds, notes, or other obligations issued under this subsection (7) shall not constitute an indebtedness of the entity or the cooperating or contracting parties within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitations or other provision. Each bond, note, or other obligation issued under this subsection (7) shall recite in substance that said bond, note, or other obligation, including the interest thereon, is payable solely from the revenues and other available funds of the entity pledged for the payment thereof and that said bond, note, or other obligation does not constitute a debt of the entity or the cooperating or contracting parties within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitation or provision. Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, such bonds, notes, and other obligations may be issued to mature at such times not beyond forty years from their respective issue dates, shall bear interest at such rates, and shall be sold at, above, or below the principal amount thereof, all as shall be determined by the board of directors of the entity.

The resolution, trust indenture, or other security agreement under which any bonds, notes, or other obligations are issued shall constitute a contract with the holders thereof, and it may contain such provisions as shall be determined by the board of directors of the entity to be appropriate and necessary in connection with the issuance thereof and to provide security for the payment thereof, including, without limitation, any mortgage or other security interest in any revenues, funds, rights, or properties of the entity. The bonds, notes, and other obligations of the entity and the income therefrom shall be exempt from taxation by this state, except inheritance, estate, and transfer taxes.

A separate governmental entity established by contract, if the contract so provides, shall be the successor to any nonprofit corporation, agency, or other entity theretofore organized by the contracting parties to provide the same function, service, system, or facility, and such separate governmental entity shall be entitled to all rights and privileges and shall assume all obligations and liabilities of such other entity under existing contracts to which such other entity is a party.

The authority granted pursuant to this section shall in no manner limit the powers of governments to enter into intergovernmental cooperation or contracts or to establish separate legal entities pursuant to the provisions of section 29-1-203 or any other applicable law or otherwise to carry out their powers under applicable statutory or charter provisions, nor shall such authority limit the powers reserved to cities and towns by section 2 of article XI of the state constitution. Nothing in this part 2 constitutes a legislative declaration of preference for water systems or facilities or for drainage facilities owned by separate governmental entities over water systems or facilities or over drainage facilities owned by other or different entities.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1389, § 1, effective June 21.

L. 82:

(1) amended, p. 453, § 2, effective March 17.

L. 2001:

(1), (2)(e), (3)(a), (3)(d), (3)(e), (3)(n), (3)(o), (5), and (9) amended, p. 61, § 1, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section was enacted as § 29-1-203.2 in House Bill 77-1211 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.